Massachusetts, session 194th, S1075.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 218 of the General Laws, as appearing in 2022 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 307 to 308, inclusive, the words “The district 
court at Winchendon, held at Winchendon; Winchendon, Ashburnham, Phillipston, Royalston 
and Templeton.” 
SECTION 2. Said section 1, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by striking out, 
in line 282, the words “Gardner, Petersham, Hubbardston and Westminster” and inserting in 
place thereof the following words:- Ashburnham, Gardner, Hubbardston, Petersham, Phillipston, 
Royalston, Templeton, Westminster and Winchendon.